Texas statutes.
LABOR CODE

TITLE 4. EMPLOYMENT SERVICES AND UNEMPLOYMENT

SUBTITLE B. TEXAS WORKFORCE COMMISSION; WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT; EMPLOYMENT SERVICES

CHAPTER 314. TEXAS BACK TO WORK PROGRAM

Sec. 314.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "qualified applicant" means a person who made less than $40 per hour at the person's last employment before becoming unemployed.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 4 (S.B. 1), Sec. 35.02, eff. September 28, 2011.

Sec. 314.002. INITIATIVE ESTABLISHED. (a) The Texas Back to Work Program is established within the commission.

(b) The purpose of the program is to establish public-private partnerships with employers to transition residents of this state from receiving unemployment compensation to becoming employed as members of the workforce.

(c) An employer that participates in the initiative may receive a wage subsidy for hiring one or more qualified applicants who are unemployed at the time of hire.

(d) The commission, for the purposes of this section, may use:

(1) money appropriated to the commission; and

(2) money that is transferred to the commission from trusteed programs within the office of the governor, including:

(A) appropriated money from the Texas Enterprise Fund;

(B) available federal funds; and

(C) money from other appropriate, statutorily authorized funding sources.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 4 (S.B. 1), Sec. 35.02, eff. September 28, 2011.

Sec. 314.003. RULES. The commission may adopt rules as necessary to implement this chapter.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 4 (S.B. 1), Sec. 35.02, eff. September 28, 2011.